Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2803
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Municipal Proprietary Function Act:

(1) Fiscal year shall mean the twelve-month period established by each governing body for each proprietary function of municipal government for determining and carrying on its financial affairs for each proprietary function;

(2) Governing body shall mean the city council in the case of a city of any class and the board of trustees in the case of a village and shall include any city with a home rule charter;

(3) Municipal budget statement shall mean a budget statement adopted by a governing body for nonproprietary functions of the municipality under the Nebraska Budget Act;

(4) Proprietary budget statement shall mean a budget adopted by a governing body for each proprietary function pursuant to the Municipal Proprietary Function Act; and

(5) Proprietary function shall mean a water supply or distribution utility, a wastewater collection or treatment utility, an electric generation, transmission, or distribution utility, a gas supply, transmission, or distribution utility, an integrated solid waste management collection, disposal, or handling utility, or a hospital or a nursing home owned by a municipality.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 3.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.